Hawaii statutes.
[§658D-3] Policy. It is the policy of
the State of Hawaii to encourage the use of arbitration, mediation, and
conciliation to resolve disputes arising out of international relationships and
to maximize private autonomy over such proceedings by limiting court
involvement therein to:

(1) The enforcement of decisions, awards, and
settlement; and

(2) Ancillary matters in aid of such proceedings. [L
1988, c 186, pt of §1]

Revision Note

Paragraphs redesignated and in paragraph (1), comma added
after "awards" pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next